Washington statutes.
RCW 26.27.241

Notice—Opportunity to be heard—Joinder.

(1) Before a child custody determination is made under this chapter, notice and an opportunity to be heard in accordance with the standards of RCW 26.27.081 must be given to: (a) All persons entitled to notice under the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state; (b) any parent whose parental rights have not been previously terminated; and (c) any person having physical custody of the child.

(2) This chapter does not govern the enforceability of a child custody determination made without notice or an opportunity to be heard.

(3) The obligation to join a party and the right to intervene as a party in a child custody proceeding under this chapter are governed by the law of this state as in child custody proceedings between residents of this state.

[ 2001 c 65 s 205.]